src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k39_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sjógvur
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: sjógv
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: sjógvi
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: sjóvar
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: sjógvar
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: sjógvar
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: sjógvum
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: sjógva
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: sjógvurin
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: sjógvin
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [sjónum, sjógvinum]
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: sjóvarins
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: sjógvarnir
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: sjógvarnar
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: sjógvunum
    sjógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: sjógvanna
